Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-17,100
Investment of funds.

The board of directors shall have charge of the investment of funds, except that the board may designate an investment committee or investment officer to make investments on its behalf under written investment policies established by the board.

Laws 1996, LB 948, § 100.